Utah statutes.
41-6a-405.   Garage keeper to report damaged vehicle without damage sticker.
(1) (a)  The person in charge of any garage or repair shop shall make a report
to the nearest law enforcement agency within 24 hours of receiving a vehicle
which shows evidence of having been:
(i)  involved in an accident for which an accident report may be requested
under Section 41-6a-402; or
(ii)  struck by any bullet.
(b)  The report required under Subsection (1)(a) shall include the:
(i)  vehicle identification number;
(ii)  registration number; and
(iii)  name and address of the owner or operator of the vehicle.
(2)  If a damaged vehicle sticker describing the damage is affixed to the
vehicle by a peace officer, a report under Subsection (1) is not required.
